Maine, session 132, LD1534.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA c. 187, sub-c. 7 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 7
MUNICIPAL REGULATION OF RESIDENTIAL DWELLING UNITS
§4459. Municipal opt-in
The provisions of this subchapter apply to a municipality if the municipality
incorporates this subchapter by reference in the adoption of an ordinance or bylaw; in the
amendment to or adoption of a charter provision; or in the adoption pursuant to a
referendum. Nothing in this subchapter limits the home rule authority of municipalities to
adopt ordinances, bylaws or charter provisions on the same subject matter as this
subchapter.
§4460. Rent increase limits
A municipality may by adoption of an ordinance or bylaw; by amendment to or
adoption of a charter provision; or by adoption pursuant to a referendum impose a limit on
the amount of an annual rent increase for a residential dwelling unit within the municipality.
A limit on an annual rent increase for a residential dwelling unit may not exceed the annual
change in the Consumer Price Index, as defined in Title 25, section 1611, subsection 1-A,
for the applicable area or 5% of the base rent, whichever is lower.
For purposes of this section, the rent amount in place 12 months prior to the date of
adoption of the ordinance or bylaw; the amendment to or adoption of the charter provision;
or adoption pursuant to a referendum is the base rent upon which an annual rent increase
limit is calculated. If the residential dwelling unit was vacant 12 months prior to the date
of adoption of the ordinance or bylaw; the amendment to or adoption of the charter
provision; or adoption pursuant to a referendum, the last rent amount charged is the base
rent. If there was no previous rent amount, or if no rent has been charged for at least the
previous 5 years since adoption of the ordinance or bylaw; the amendment to or adoption
of the charter provision; or adoption pursuant to a referendum, the rent amount the owner,
landlord or property manager of the residential dwelling unit first charged is the base rent.
§4460-A. Evictions based on just cause
A municipality may by adoption of an ordinance or bylaw; by amendment to or
adoption of a charter provision; or by adoption pursuant to a referendum require that an
eviction or refusal by the owner, landlord or property manager of a residential dwelling
unit to renew a lease be based on just cause. For purposes of this section, "just cause"
includes:
1. Nonpayment. A tenant failing to pay rent;
2. Substantial violation. A tenant committing a substantial violation of a material lease
term or term of the tenancy;
3. Criminal activity. A tenant engaging in criminal activity that threatens the health
and safety of other tenants or persons lawfully on the premises of the residential dwelling
unit; and
Page 1 - 132LR0893(01)

4. Removal of unit from rental market. An owner seeking to remove the residential
dwelling unit from the rental market in order to convert the residential dwelling unit into a
cooperative or condominium, to demolish the residential dwelling unit, to convert the
residential dwelling unit to nonresidential use or to occupy the residential dwelling unit as
the owner's principal residence.
A municipality may further define "just cause" by ordinance, bylaw, charter provision
or referendum.
§4460-B. Exemptions
The following types of residential dwelling units within a municipality that adopts the
provisions of this subchapter are exempt from sections 4460 and 4460-A:
1. Owner-occupied units. Residential dwelling units in owner-occupied buildings
with 4 or fewer residential dwelling units;
2. Housing authority units. Residential dwelling units subject to regulation by a
housing authority as defined in section 4702, subsection 2, except that occupancy by a
tenant receiving housing assistance under 42 United States Code, Section 1437f(o)(12)
does not exempt a residential dwelling unit otherwise subject to the provisions of section
4460 or 4460-A;
3. Dormitories. Dormitories owned or managed by an educational institution where
sleeping accommodations are provided in single rooms or in a series of closely associated
rooms; and
4. Elderly residential care facilities. Facilities for the residential care of persons who
are elderly.
Once annually, the owner, landlord or property manager of a residential dwelling unit
shall provide a written notice to the tenant of an exempt residential dwelling unit citing the
specific exemption for the residential dwelling unit under this section and the date an
exemption expires, if any.
§4460-C. Reports
Beginning January 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, a municipality adopting the
provisions of this subchapter pursuant to section 4459 shall provide a report to the Maine
State Housing Authority and the Maine Office of Community Affairs. The report must
include the text of the ordinance, bylaw, charter provision or referendum adopting the
provisions of this subchapter; any studies undertaken that informed the adoption of the
ordinance, bylaw, charter provision or referendum; the number of residential dwelling units
affected by the ordinance, bylaw, charter provision or referendum; and any other
information or data considered relevant by the Maine State Housing Authority or the Maine
Office of Community Affairs.
§4460-D. Violations
Any violation of this subchapter is an unfair method of competition or an unfair or
deceptive act or practice under Title 5, chapter 10. Any person claiming a violation of this
subchapter may pursue remedies under Title 5, chapter 10, and the Attorney General is
authorized to bring an action or institute a proceeding under Title 5, section 209.
§4460-E. Other rights or protections
Page 2 - 132LR0893(01)

This subchapter may not be construed to interfere with any existing rights or
protections afforded tenants under state or federal law.